Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1091.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MINNESOTA ZOOLOGICAL GARDEN.new text end new text begin $4,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $4,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the Minnesota Zoological Board for programs at and development of the Minnesota Zoological Garden and to expand access, engage new audiences, and provide education related to the cultural heritage of Minnesota. new text end